Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-104.03
Martin Luther King, Jr. Day; proclamation by Governor; commemoration.

(1) The Governor shall, prior to January 15 of each year, issue a proclamation inviting and urging the people of the State of Nebraska to observe Martin Luther King, Jr. Day in schools and other suitable places with appropriate ceremony and fellowship.

(2) The State Department of Education is directed to make, within the limits of funds available for such purpose, information available to the schools and all people of this state regarding Martin Luther King, Jr. Day and the observance thereof.

Laws 1978, LB 329, § 2.